Illinois, session 104th, HB4461.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Fair Patient Billing Act is amended by 5changing Section 30 as follows: 6    (210 ILCS 88/30)7    Sec. 30. Pursuing collection action. 8    (a) Hospitals and their agents may pursue collection 9action against an uninsured patient only if the following 10conditions are met:11        (1) The hospital has complied with the screening 12    requirements set forth in Section 16 and applied and 13    exhausted any discount available to a patient under 14    Section 10 of the Hospital Uninsured Patient Discount Act. 15        (2) The hospital has given the uninsured patient the 16    opportunity to:17            (A) assess the accuracy of the bill;18            (B) apply for financial assistance under the 19        hospital's financial assistance policy; and20            (C) avail themselves of a reasonable payment plan.21        (3) If the uninsured patient has indicated an 22    inability to pay the full amount of the debt in one 23    payment, the hospital has offered the patient a reasonable   HB4461 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 16887 BAB 30298 b1    payment plan. The hospital may require the uninsured 2    patient to provide reasonable verification of his or her 3    inability to pay the full amount of the debt in one 4    payment.5        (4) To the extent the hospital provides financial 6    assistance and the circumstances of the uninsured patient 7    suggest the potential for eligibility for charity care, 8    the uninsured patient has been given at least 90 days 9    following the date of discharge or receipt of outpatient 10    care to submit an application for financial assistance and 11    shall be provided assistance with the application in 12    compliance with subsection (a) of Section 16 and Section 13    27.14        (5) If the uninsured patient has agreed to a 15    reasonable payment plan with the hospital, and the patient 16    has failed to make payments in accordance with that 17    reasonable payment plan.18        (6) If the uninsured patient informs the hospital that 19    he or she has applied for health care coverage under a 20    public health insurance program (and there is a reasonable 21    basis to believe that the patient will qualify for such 22    program) but the patient's application is denied. 23    (a-5) A hospital shall proactively offer information on 24charity care options available to uninsured patients, 25regardless of their immigration status or residency. 26    (b) A hospital may not refer a bill, or portion thereof, to   HB4461 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 16887 BAB 30298 b1a collection agency or attorney for collection action against 2the insured patient, without first ensuring compliance with 3Section 16 and offering the patient the opportunity to request 4a reasonable payment plan for the amount personally owed by 5the patient. Such an opportunity shall be made available for 6the 90 days following the date of the initial bill. If the 7insured patient requests a reasonable payment plan, but fails 8to agree to a plan within 90 days of the request, the hospital 9may proceed with collection action against the patient.10    (c) No collection agency, law firm, or individual may 11initiate legal action for non-payment of a hospital bill 12against a patient without the written approval of an 13authorized hospital employee who reasonably believes that the 14conditions for pursuing collection action under this Section 15have been met.16    (c-5) For any legal action initiated against a patient for 17unpaid medical debt, a hospital may not file for or be granted 18a lien upon that patient's primary residence. 19    (d) Nothing in this Section prohibits a hospital from 20engaging an outside third party agency, firm, or individual to 21manage the process of implementing the hospital's financial 22assistance and reasonable payment plan programs and policies 23so long as such agency, firm, or individual is contractually 24bound to comply with the terms of this Act. 25(Source: P.A. 102-504, eff. 12-1-21; 103-323, eff. 1-1-24.)   HB4461 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 16887 BAB 30298 b1    Section 10. The Code of Civil Procedure is amended by 2changing Section 12-101 as follows: 3    (735 ILCS 5/12-101)  (from Ch. 110, par. 12-101)4    Sec. 12-101. Lien of judgment. With respect to the 5creation of liens on real estate by judgments, all real estate 6in the State of Illinois is divided into 2 classes.7    The first class consists of all real property, the title 8to which is registered under "An Act concerning land titles", 9approved May 1, 1897, as amended.10    The second class consists of all real property not 11registered under "An Act concerning land titles".12    As to real estate in class one, a judgment is a lien on the 13real estate of the person against whom it is entered for the 14same period as in class two, when Section 85 of "An Act 15concerning land titles", has been complied with.16    As to real estate included within class two, a judgment is 17a lien on the real estate of the person against whom it is 18entered in any county in this State, including the county in 19which it is entered, only from the time a transcript, 20certified copy or memorandum of the judgment is filed in the 21office of the recorder in the county in which the real estate 22is located. The lien may be foreclosed by an action brought in 23the name of the judgment creditor or its assignee of record 24under Article XV in the same manner as a mortgage of real 25property, except that the redemption period shall be 6 months   HB4461 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 16887 BAB 30298 b1from the date of sale and the real estate homestead exemption 2under Section 12-901 shall apply. A judgment resulting from 3the entry of an order requiring child support payments shall 4be a lien upon the real estate of the person obligated to make 5the child support payments, but shall not be enforceable in 6any county of this State until a transcript, certified copy, 7or memorandum of the lien is filed in the office of the 8recorder in the county in which the real estate is located. Any 9lien hereunder arising out of an order for support shall be a 10lien only as to and from the time that an installment or 11payment is due under the terms of the order. Further, the order 12for support shall not be a lien on real estate to the extent of 13payments made as evidenced by the records of the Clerk of the 14Circuit Court or State agency receiving payments pursuant to 15the order. In the event payments made pursuant to that order 16are not paid to the Clerk of the Circuit Court or a State 17agency, then each lien imposed by this Section may be released 18in the following manner: 19        (a) A Notice of Filing and an affidavit stating that 20    all installments of child support required to be paid 21    pursuant to the order under which the lien or liens were 22    imposed have been paid shall be filed with the office of 23    recorder in each county in which each such lien appears of 24    record, together with proof of service of such notice and 25    affidavit upon the recipient of such payments. 26        (b) Service of such affidavit shall be by any means   HB4461 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 16887 BAB 30298 b1    authorized under Sections 2-203 and 2-208 of the Code of 2    Civil Procedure or under Supreme Court Rules 11 or 105(b). 3        (c) The Notice of Filing shall set forth the name and 4    address of the judgment debtor and the judgment creditor, 5    the court file number of the order giving rise to the 6    judgment and, in capital letters, the following statement: 7        YOU ARE HEREBY NOTIFIED THAT ON (insert date) THE 8    ATTACHED AFFIDAVIT WAS FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE RECORDER 9    OF .... COUNTY, ILLINOIS, WHOSE ADDRESS IS ........, 10    ILLINOIS. IF, WITHIN 28 DAYS OF THE DATE OF THIS NOTICE, 11    YOU FAIL TO FILE AN AFFIDAVIT OBJECTING TO THE RELEASE OF 12    THE STATED JUDGMENT LIEN OR LIENS, IN THE ABOVE OFFICE, 13    SUCH JUDGMENT LIEN WILL BE DEEMED TO BE RELEASED AND NO 14    LONGER SUBJECT TO FORECLOSURE. THIS RELEASE OF LIEN WILL 15    NOT ACT AS A SATISFACTION OF SUCH JUDGMENT. 16        (d) If no affidavit objecting to the release of the 17    lien or liens is filed within 28 days of the Notice 18    described in paragraph (c) of this Section such lien or 19    liens shall be deemed to be released and no longer subject 20    to foreclosure.21    A judgment is not a lien on real estate for longer than 7 22years from the time it is entered or revived, unless the 23judgment is revived within 7 years after its entry or last 24revival and a new memorandum of judgment is recorded prior to 25the judgment and its recorded memorandum of judgment becoming 26dormant.  HB4461 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 16887 BAB 30298 b1    When a judgment is revived it is a lien on the real estate 2of the person against whom it was entered in any county in this 3State from the time a transcript, certified copy or memorandum 4of the order of revival is filed in the office of the recorder 5in the county in which the real estate is located.6    A foreign judgment registered or filed pursuant to 7Sections 12-630 through 12-672 of this Act is a lien upon the 8real estate of the person against whom it was entered only from 9the time (1) a copy of the affidavit required by Section 12-653 10with a copy of the foreign judgment attached showing the 11filing in a court of this State or (2) a transcript, certified 12copy or memorandum of a final judgment of the court of this 13State entered on an action to enforce a foreign judgment is 14filed in the office of the recorder in the county in which the 15real estate is located. However, no such judgment shall be a 16lien on any real estate registered under "An Act concerning 17land titles", as amended, until Section 85 of that Act has been 18complied with.19    The release of any transcript, certified copy or 20memorandum of judgment or order of revival which has been 21recorded shall be filed by the person receiving the release in 22the office of the recorder in which such judgment or order has 23been recorded.24    Such release shall contain in legible letters a statement 25as follows: 26        FOR THE PROTECTION OF THE OWNER, THIS RELEASE SHALL BE   HB4461 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 16887 BAB 30298 b1    FILED WITH THE RECORDER OR THE REGISTRAR OF TITLES IN 2    WHOSE OFFICE THE LIEN WAS FILED.3    The term "memorandum" as used in this Section means a 4memorandum or copy of the judgment signed by a judge or a copy 5attested by the clerk of the court entering it and showing the 6court in which entered, date, amount, number of the case in 7which it was entered, name of the party in whose favor and name 8and last known address of the party against whom entered. If 9the address of the party against whom the judgment was entered 10is not known, the memorandum or copy of judgment shall so 11state.12    The term "memorandum" as used in this Section also means a 13memorandum or copy of a child support order signed by a judge 14or a copy attested by the clerk of the court entering it or a 15copy attested by the administrative body entering it.16    This Section shall not be construed as showing an 17intention of the legislature to create a new classification of 18real estate, but shall be construed as showing an intention of 19the legislature to continue a classification already existing.20    No judgment relating to unpaid medical debt may create a 21lien on real property owned by the patient against whom the 22judgment is entered that is the primary residence of the 23patient.24(Source: P.A. 97-350, eff. 1-1-12; 98-557, eff. 1-1-14.) 25    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect on 26January 1, 2027.